Utah statutes.
78B-6-901.   Form of action -- Judgment -- Special execution.

(1)  There is only one action for the recovery of any debt, or the enforcement of any right, secured solely by mortgage upon real estate and that action shall be in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

(2)  A judgment shall include:

(a)  the amount due, with costs and disbursements;

(b)  an order for the sale of mortgaged property, or a portion of it to satisfy the amount and accruing costs;

(c)  direction to the sheriff to proceed and sell the property according to the provisions of law relating to sales on execution; and

(d)  a special execution or order of sale shall be issued for that purpose.



Amended by Chapter 146, 2009 General Session

